North Carolina statutes. Chapter 126. North Carolina Human Resources Act.
Article 12. Work Options Program for State Employees.

§ 126-74.
Work Options Program established.

There is established a Work Options Program for State employees in the Office of State Human Resources to be administered by the State Human Resources Commission. The Director of the Office of State Human Resources shall assign an employee within the Office of State Human Resources, to be known as the State Work Options Coordinator, to direct the Work Options Program as established in this Article.

History.

1981, c. 917, s. 1; 1991, c. 65, s. 8; 2013-382, s. 9.1(c).

§ 126-75.
Work options for State employees.

The following work options allowed State employees are to be included in the program administered under this Article:

Flexible work hours as established by the State Human Resources Commission;

Job sharing as permitted by the State Human Resources Commission;

Permanent part-time positions as established under the North Carolina Human Resources Act.

The State Human Resources Commission shall examine the present options listed in subsection (a) of this section available to State employees and other options the State Human Resources Commission may make available for a comprehensive program of work options for State employees. The State Human Resources Commission shall, with the concurrence of the agency, determine the need for additional permanent part-time positions within State Government and how increased use of these positions could benefit employee morale and productivity as well as increase the use of the available labor force. None of the provisions of this Article shall be administered to reduce the total number of hours per day a State office normally is open to serve the public.

History.

1981, c. 917, s. 1; 2013-382, s. 9.1(c).

§ 126-76.
Promoting Work Options Program.

The State Human Resources Commission shall develop a program to expand the use of work options. This program shall include training sessions for agency personnel to instruct them in the use of work options available to State employees. The State Human Resources Commission shall also provide technical assistance to agency personnel in developing a Work Options Program for each agency or expanding existing programs in each agency. The Work Options Coordinator shall also identify personnel positions within the State Human Resources system which can effectively be structured in job sharing or permanent part-time employment positions.

History.

1981, c. 917, s. 1; 2013-382, s. 9.1(c); 2014-115, s. 55.4(c).

§ 126-77.
Authority of agencies to participate.

The State Human Resources Commission shall request from each agency assistance in formulating the Work Options Program. Any division, department, agency, instrumentality or authority shall participate in the program of work options as established in this Article.

History.

1981, c. 917, s. 1; 2013-382, s. 9.1(c).

§ 126-78.
Administration.

The State Human Resources Commission and any State division, department, agency, instrumentality or authority participating in the State Work Options Program shall promulgate rules necessary for the administration of the program.

History.

1981, c. 917, s. 1; 1987, c. 827, s. 57; 2013-382, s. 9.1(c).

§ 126-79.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 2013-382, s. 7.7, effective August 21, 2013.

History.

1981, c. 917, s. 1; repealed by 2013-382, s. 7.7, effective August 21, 2013.